Massachusetts, session 194th, H647.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION. 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out section 1G and inserting in place thereof the following:-
Section 1G. (a) The board shall establish the minimum length for a school day and
the minimum number of days in the school year.
(b) (i) The school day for all high schools, including high schools operated as
charter schools, shall begin no earlier than 8:30 a.m.
(ii) The school day for all middle schools, including middle schools operated as
charter schools, shall begin no earlier than 8:00 a.m.
(iii) For purposes of this section, “school day” has the same meaning as defined by
the school district or charter school for purposes of calculating average daily attendance in order
to compute any apportionments of state funding.
of 2

(iv) The board shall promulgate such rules and regulations as necessary to
implement this section in a manner that is fair and equitable.
(v) If the board determines that this section contains costs mandated by the state,
reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to
chapters 70 and 71.
(vi) This section shall not apply to rural school districts.
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall be implemented by all public schools no later than
July 1, 2028, or the date on which a school district’s or charter school’s respective collective
bargaining agreement that is operative on January 1, 2026, expires, whichever is later. Section 1
shall apply to all academic years after July 1, 2028.
of 2